Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 3 General Assembly Members

17-3-1.
Time of election — Term of office.

Senators and representatives in the general assembly shall be elected biennially, at general elections, in each senatorial and representative district in accordance with the provisions of this title; and shall hold their respective offices for two (2) years beginning on the first Tuesday of January, next succeeding their election, and until the election and qualification of their respective successors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1230, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 29; P.L. 1912, ch. 819, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 14, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 321, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-1

; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 3.

17-3-2.
Adjournment of election meetings.

All senatorial district, representative district, and voting district meetings held in any district for the election of senators and representatives in the general assembly, or of any one or more of them, shall, at the time of closing the polls in that district as prescribed by law, stand adjourned until the date named in the warrant provided in §

17-3-3

to be issued in case of no election, or until the state board has notified the secretary of state that an election of senator and representative in the general assembly from the district has been made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1230, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 15, § 2; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 14, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 321, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-2

; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 3.

17-3-3.
Adjourned elections on failure to elect.

If it appears by the count of the state board that no election has been made of any one or more of the senators or representatives in the general assembly, at any election held for those officers, the board shall, immediately after the count, notify the secretary of state of the failure to elect; the secretary of state shall, immediately after the notification, direct the local boards in the senatorial or representative districts to issue their warrants to the moderators of the district, districts, or voting districts, as the case may be, directing the election to proceed on the tenth (10th) day from the date of the warrant, unless the day is a legal holiday, in which case the secretary of state shall direct the election to proceed on the next day after the tenth (10th) day not a legal holiday, for the officer or officers for which there was no choice, which warrant shall be served on the day of its issue by the several city or town sergeants or constables; provided, there shall be no election held on Saturday, and if the tenth (10th) day falls on Saturday, the election shall proceed on the Monday next following, unless that Monday is a legal or religious holiday, in which case the election shall proceed on the next following day which is not a legal or religious holiday.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1230, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 15, § 4; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 14, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 321, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1040, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-3

; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 3.

17-3-4.
Candidates and ballots at adjourned elections.

At the adjourned elections provided for in §

17-3-3

, the official ballot shall contain the names of the candidates for the offices for which there was no choice at the first election, and shall be printed and supplied by the secretary of state; provided, that in case any candidate has died, the senatorial district or representative district committee, as the case may be, of the party to which the candidate belonged may substitute the name of some other person as a candidate and that name shall be printed upon the official ballot, if the substitution is made in time to allow it to be printed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1230, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 15, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 14, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 321, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-4

; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 3; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 3.

17-3-5.
Death, refusal, or incapacity of senator or representative elect.

Whenever any person elected a senator or representative in the general assembly, at any time between the day of his or her election and the beginning of his or her term of office, refuses to serve and so declares to the secretary of state, or dies, becomes insane, removes from the state, or is otherwise incapacitated, the secretary of state shall immediately cause a warrant to be issued ordering a new election of senator or representative, as the case may be, to be held in that district at least seventy (70) but not more than ninety (90) days from the occurrence of the refusal or incapacity.

Every person elected pursuant to the provisions of this section shall hold his or her office for the full term or for the remainder of the term, as the case may be, of the office that person is elected to fill, and until that person’s successor is elected and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1230, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 15, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 14, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 321, § 4; P.L. 1954, ch. 3313, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-5

; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 277, § 1.

17-3-6.
Vacancy in general assembly — Special elections.

Whenever from any cause a vacancy occurs in the representation of any senatorial or representative district in the general assembly while the general assembly is in session, the secretary of state shall cause the local board of the city or town to issue a warrant ordering an election to fill the vacancy, to be held in that district at least seventy (70) but not more than ninety (90) days from the occurrence of the vacancy; provided, that if the general assembly has nearly completed its January session so that it is doubtful whether the person to be chosen can serve as a member at that session, the election shall not be ordered within that time limit, but may be held at any later date within that calendar year, if that year is the first year of the biennial period for which a general assembly has been chosen. And, provided further, the election to fill the vacancy shall be held on a Tuesday that falls between the seventieth and ninetieth day of the vacancy. If the vacancy occurs after the first Monday in February in the second year of the biennial period for which a general assembly was chosen, no warrant shall be issued for a special election to fill the vacancy. If the vacancy occurs or exists at any other time when the general assembly is not in session, the secretary of state shall cause to be issued a warrant for an election to be held to fill the vacancy.

Every person elected pursuant to the provisions of this section shall hold his or her office for the remainder of the term that person is elected to fill, and until his or her successor is elected and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1230, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 15, § 6; P.L. 1921, ch. 2092, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 14, § 6; P.L. 1930, ch. 1530, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 321, § 5; P.L. 1954, ch. 3313, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-2-6

; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 3; P.L. 1991, ch. 194, § 1; 1991, ch. 277, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 182, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 279, § 2.

17-3-7.
Nominations at special elections.

For the elections provided for in §§

17-3-5

and

17-3-6

, certificates of nomination and nomination papers may be filed twenty-eight (28) days prior to the date of those primary elections.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1230, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 15, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 14, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 321, § 6; G.L. 1956, § 17-2-7; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 277, § 1.

17-3-8.
Failure to issue warrant for election.

Every member of a local board who neglects to seasonably issue his or her warrant as provided in this chapter shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1230, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 15, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 14, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 321, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1954, ch. 3313, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 17-2-8; G.L. 1956, §

17-3-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 3; P.L. 1978, ch. 201, § 2.